Missouri, session 2026, HB1920.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 192 and 197, RSMo, are amended by adding thereto two new
sections, to be known as sections 192.918 and 197.752, to read as follows:
192.918. The department of health and senior services shall implement an
education and awareness program to promote respect for health care professionals and
educate the public on the legal consequences of assaulting health care professionals.
197.752. 1. A hospital may receive reimbursement from the state for moneys
spent on new physical property, or on new technology compliant with the National
Defense Authorization Act, that enhances the physical security of the hospital during the
two years following the effective date of this section.
2. A hospital may receive reimbursement from the state for new payroll costs for
any security personnel the hospital may employ to provide security for the hospital
during the three years following the effective date of this section.
3. Reimbursement from the state under this section shall be subject to
appropriations.
4. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Hospital Security
Fund", which shall consist of moneys appropriated to it by the general assembly and
any gifts, contributions, grants, or bequests received from federal, private, or other
sources. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections
30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund shall be a
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1920 2
dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, moneys in this fund shall be used solely for
reimbursement payments to hospitals as described in this section.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
5. This section shall expire on August 28, 2029.
✔